Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3975.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; NEIGHBORHOOD DEVELOPMENT CENTER.new text end new text begin $1,200,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to Neighborhood Development Center to develop, equip, and launch programming for The Ruckus, a new small business and entrepreneurship facility designed to support the second stage for entrepreneurs as they move from startup to substantial revenue growth. Money may be used to design and implement core programs; build entrepreneur cohorts; establish industry, retail, and capital partnerships; and purchase the equipment and tools needed for programming to be fully operational when the facility opens. Programming must include a technology and business accelerator for founders ready to scale validated ideas, a beauty and wellness production and market access program that supports compliant product development and launch, and a retail readiness initiative that prepares consumer brands to successfully enter and expand in retail markets. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end